src/verb-myv-morph.txt
LEXICON VERBNEGATIVE
аволть+V+Neg+Conj+ScPl3:авольть # ;
< а в о л ь "+V":0 "+Pred":0 "+Neg":0 "+Conj":0  "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> IndicativePretI-plus ;
аволь+V+Neg+Conj+ScSg3:аволь # ;
< и л я "+V":0 "+Pred":0 "+Neg":0 "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> ILYA ;


эзть+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3:эзть # ;
< э з ь "+V":0 "+Neg":0 "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@" > IndicativePrt2_kadoms ;
< э з ь "+V":0 "+Neg":0 "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+Prt1":0 "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@" > IndicativePretI-plus ;
эзь+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3:эзь # ;
эзь+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3:эсе # ;

LEXICON V-ledems_ObjAll
< "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> V-ledems ;

LEXICON V-kadoms_ObjAll
< "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> V-kadoms ;

! This should not occur
!LEXICON V-sajevems_ObjAll
!< "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> V-sajevems ;

LEXICON V-nevtems_ObjAll
< "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> V-nevtems ;

LEXICON V-savtoms_ObjAll
< "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> V-savtoms ;

LEXICON V-chachtoms_ObjAll
< "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> V-chachtoms ;

!LEXICON V-jangavoms_ObjAll
!< "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> V-jangavoms ;

LEXICON V-kundams_ObjAll
< "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> V-kundams ;

! This actually does exist in a pair verb
! таргатомс
LEXICON V-satoms_ObjAll
< "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> V-satoms ;

! This should not exist by definition
! 
!LEXICON V-letems_ObjAll
!< "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> V-letems ;

LEXICON V-ujems_ObjAll
< "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> V-ujems ;

LEXICON V-ujems
:й V-kadoms ;

LEXICON V-tujems_ObjAll
< "+V":0 "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> Indicative_Present_Obj ;
< "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> V-tujems ;

LEXICON V-tujems
:й V-kadoms ;
< "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" > PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;



LEXICON V-tejems_ObjAll
< "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> V-tejems ;

LEXICON V-tejems
 V-kadoms ;

LEXICON V-nejems_ObjAll
< "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> V-nejems ;

LEXICON V-nejems
:й V-kadoms ;
< "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" > PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;


LEXICON V-mijems_ObjAll
< "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> V-mijems ;

LEXICON V-mijems
:й V-kadoms ;
< "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" > PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;

LEXICON V-nekshnems_ObjAll
< "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> V-nekshnems ;
!!2012-04-24 the TAG "+ObjOpen":0 has been removed 

LEXICON V-nekshnems
+Stem/е:е V-kundams ;
+Stem/э:э V-kundams ;


LEXICON V-ledems
 V-kadoms ;

LEXICON V-savtoms
 V-kadoms ;

LEXICON V-chachtoms
 V-kadoms ;
< 0:а "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" > PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;

LEXICON V-nevtems
 V-kadoms ;

LEXICON V-kadoms
+V:  CondVerbs ;
+V: VerbsPresPtc_1 ;
< "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" > PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;
< "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" > V-kadoms-a ;
+V: Deverbals-kadoms ;
< "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" "+Pred":0 "+Conj":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@" > Conjunctive-kadoms ;

LEXICON V-sajevems
+V:  CondVerbs ;
+V:     VerbsPresPtc_1 ;
< "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" > PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;
< "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" > V-kadoms-a ;
+V:  Deverbals-kadoms ;
< "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" "+Pred":0 0:">" 0:"WLoss" "+Conj":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@" > Conjunctive-noArrow ;
< "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" "+Pred":0 "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:О1 "+Conj":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@" > Conjunctive-noArrow ;

LEXICON V-jangavoms
 V-sajevems ;

LEXICON V-kundams
+V:  CondVerbs ;
+V:     VerbsPresPtc_1 ;
< "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" > PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;
< "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" > V-kundams-a ;
+V:  Deverbals-kundams ; !This denies linking vowel
< "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" "+Pred":0 "+Conj":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@" > Conjunctive-kundams ;

LEXICON V-satoms
+V:  CondVerbs ;
+V:     VerbsPresPtc_1 ;
< "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" > V-satoms-a ;
< "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" > PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;
+V:  Deverbals-kadoms ; 
< "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" "+Pred":0 "+Conj":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@" > Conjunctive-kadoms ;

LEXICON V-letems
 V-satoms ;

LEXICON V-kadoms-a
< "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" > Indicative1 ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:К3 "+ConNeg":0 "@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@" > kudo-Tenses1 ;
 Desiderative-kadoms ;

< "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" > IndicativePrt2_kadoms ;
< "+Pred":0 "+Imprt":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@" > Imperative-kadoms ;
< "+Pred":0 "+Opt":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@" > Optative-kadoms ;

LEXICON V-kundams-a
< "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" > Indicative1 ;
< 0:">" 0:К3 "+ConNeg":0 "@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@" > kudo-Tenses1 ;
 Desiderative-kundams ;
< "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" > IndicativePrt2_kundams ;
< "+Pred":0 "+Imprt":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@" > Imperative-kundams ;
< "+Pred":0 "+Opt":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@" > Optative-kundams ;


LEXICON V-satoms-a
 CondVerbs ;
< "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" > Indicative1 ;
+Use/Sub/Dial: PredIndPrt1Sc3 ; !!2012-05-05 What's this for
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:К3 "+ConNeg":0 "@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@" > kudo-Tenses1 ;
< 0:">" 0:О1 0:т 0:Ь2 "+ConNeg":0 "@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@" > kudo-Tenses1 ;
< "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" "@U.CONJ-CONNEG.NO@" "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" 0:">" 0:О1 0:т 0:с 0:ь "+Prt1":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@" "+ScSg3":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.30@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" "@U.CONJ-CONNEG.NO@" "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" 0:">" 0:О1 0:т 0:с 0:т 0:ь "+Prt1":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@" "+ScPl3":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.60@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
 Desiderative-kadoms ;
< "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" > IndicativePrt2_kadoms ;
< "+Pred":0 "+Imprt":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@" > Imperative-kadoms ;
< "+Pred":0 "+Opt":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@" > Optative-kadoms ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!! DERIVATION !!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON CondVerbs
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:д 0:е 0:р 0:я "+Der/Ындеря":0 "+Cond":0 "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" "+Pred":0 "+Conj":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@" > Conjunctive-kundams ;
!! 2012-05-04 Is this contLex correct??
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:д 0:е 0:р 0:я "+Der/Ындеря":0 "+Cond":0 "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" > Indicative1-noSc3 ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:д 0:е 0:р 0:я "+Der/Ындеря":0 "+Cond":0 "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" > PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;

!!! 2012-04-24 rather odd and infrequent
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:д 0:е 0:р 0:я "+Der/Ындеря":0 "+Cond":0 "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" > IndicativePrt2_kundams ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:д 0:е 0:р 0:я 0:й "+Der/Ындеря":0 "+Cond":0 "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg3":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.30@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:д 0:е 0:р 0:я 0:й 0:т 0:ь "+Der/Ындеря":0 "+Cond":0 "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl3":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.60@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:д 0:е 0:р 0:и "+Der/Ындеря":0 "+Cond":0 "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" "+Use/Sub":0 "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg3":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.30@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:д 0:е 0:р 0:и 0:т 0:ь "+Der/Ындеря":0 "+Cond":0 "+V":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.NO@" "+Use/Sub":0 "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl3":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.60@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V:%>Ы2ндеря   VerbsPresPtc_1 ;
+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V:%>Ы2ндеря   Deverbals-kundams ;

LEXICON VerbsPresPtc_1
+Der/Ыця+ActDemPtc:%>Ы2ця Adj-shumbra ;
+Der/Ый+ActPtcLong:%>Ы2й Adj-od ;
+Der/Ы+ActPtcShort:%>Ы2 Adj-shumbra ;
+Der/Ы+ActPtcShort+Der/кс:%>Ы2кс Adj-vanjks ;

LEXICON Deverbals-kadoms ! kadoms
< 0:">" 0:О1 "@U.CONJ-INF.YES@" > Deverbals_noArrow ;
+Der/Овт+TelicN:%>О1втЬ2 N-kit ; !!
+Der/Озь+Ger:%>О1зь sajezj-PTC ; !!
+Der/Озь+Ger+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3:%>О1зь%>тЬ2 VerbEnd_Clitic ; !!
+Der/Онь+VGen:%>О1нь kal-Tenses1 ;
+Der/Онь+VGen+Der/Dem:%>О1нсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;

< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:м 0:О1 "+Inf":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.YES@" "+Loc":0 "@U.CX.LOC@" > kudo-Possessive-Before-Clitic-or-Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:м 0:О1 "+Inf":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.YES@" 0:">" 0:к 0:с "+Tra":0 "@U.CX.TRA@" > osh-Tenses1 ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:м 0:О1 "+Inf":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.YES@" 0:">" 0:д 0:О1 "+Abl":0 "@U.CX.ABL@" > kudo-Possessive-Before-Clitic-or-Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:м 0:О1 "+Inf":0 "@U.CONJ-INF.YES@" 0:">" 0:з "+Ill":0 "@U.CX.ILL@" > osh-Possessive-Before-Clitic ;

LEXICON Deverbals-kundams ! kundams
< 0:">" "@U.CONJ-INF.YES@" > Deverbals_noArrow ;
+Der/Овт+TelicN:%>втЬ2 N-kit ; !!
+Der/Озь+Ger:%>зь sajezj-PTC ; !!
+Der/Озь+Ger+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3:%>зь%>тЬ2 VerbEnd_Clitic ; !!
+Der/Онь+VGen:%>нь kal-Tenses1 ;
+Der/Онь+VGen+Der/Dem:%>нсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;


LEXICON Deverbals_noArrow
< 0:м 0:А1 "+Der/ОмА":0 "@C.CONJ-INF@" > N-kudo ;
< 0:м 0:к 0:а "+Der/Омка":0 "@C.CONJ-INF@" > N-kudo ;
< 0:м 0:а "+Der/Ома":0 "+Oblig":0 "@U.CX.NOM@" > kudo-Tenses1-4Inf ;
< 0:м 0:к 0:а "+Der/Омка":0 "+Oblig":0 "@U.CX.NOM@" > kudo-Tenses1-4Inf ;

< 0:м 0:О1 "+Der/ОмО":0 "+Inf":0 "+Loc":0 "@U.CX.LOC@" > kudo-Possessive-Before-Clitic-or-Clitic-4Inf ;
< 0:м 0:с "+Der/Омс":0 "+Inf":0 "+Ill":0 "@U.CX.ILL@" > sajems-Conjugation-4Inf ;
< 0:м 0:с 0:т 0:О1 "+Der/ОмстО":0 "+Inf":0 "+Ela":0 "@U.CX.ELA@" > kudo-Possessive-Before-Clitic-or-Clitic-4Inf ;
< 0:м 0:с 0:О1 "+Der/ОмсО":0 "+Inf":0 "+Ine":0 "@U.CX.INE@" > kudo-Possessive-Before-Clitic-or-Clitic-4Inf ;
< 0:м 0:г 0:а "+Der/Омга":0 "+Inf":0 "+Prl":0 "@U.CX.PRL@" > kudo-Possessive-Before-Clitic-or-Clitic-4Inf ;
< 0:м 0:д 0:О1 "+Der/ОмдО":0 "+Inf":0 "+Abl":0 "@U.CX.ABL@" > kudo-Possessive-Before-Clitic-or-Clitic-4Inf ;
< 0:м 0:О1 "+Der/ОмО":0 "+Inf":0 0:">" 0:д 0:О1 "+Abl":0 "@U.CX.ABL@" > kudo-Possessive-Before-Clitic-or-Clitic-4Inf ;
< 0:м 0:О1 "+Der/ОмО":0 "+Inf":0 0:">" 0:з "+Ill":0 "@U.CX.ILL@" > osh-Possessive-Before-Clitic-or-Clitic-4Inf ;


LEXICON ActDemPtc
+ActDemPtc: Adj-shumbra ;

LEXICON sajezj-PTC
 Adj-vanjks ;
 kal-NomSg-Conjugation-only ;
 kal-NomPl-Conjugation-only ;
 VerbEnd_Clitic ;

LEXICON Ptc-Telic ! sajevtj
+Ptc+Telic: N-kit ;




!! CONJUGATION

LEXICON PredIndPrt1Sc3
< "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" "+Prt1":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@" 0:">" 0:с 0:ь "+ScSg3":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.30@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" "+Prt1":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@" 0:">" 0:с 0:т 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.60@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;


LEXICON Indicative1
 Indicative1-noSc3 ; ! This accommodates Cond
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg3":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.30@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:т 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl3":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.30@"> VerbEnd_Clitic ;

LEXICON Indicative1-noSc3
< "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" "+Prt1":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@" > IndicativePretI-plus ;
!Indicative Non-past
< 0:">" 0:А2 0:н "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg1":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.10@" >  VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:А2 0:т "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg2":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.20@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:о "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl1":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.40@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:т 0:А2 0:м "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl1":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.40@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:о 0:к "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl1":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.40@" > VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:о "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl2":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.50@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;

< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:"TLoss" 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:о "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl1":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.40@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:"TLoss" 0:т 0:А2 0:м "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl1":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.40@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:">" 0:"TLoss" 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:о 0:к "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl1":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.40@" > VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:"TLoss" 0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:о "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IND@" "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl2":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.50@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;

! Indicative Preterite I
<"@R.CONJ.ObjAll@"> Indicative_Present_Obj ;
